Tennessee statutes. Title 61 Partnerships
Part 2

Formation; Certificate of Limited Partnership and Filings

61-3-201. Formation of limited partnership — Certificate of limited partnership.

To form a limited partnership, a person must deliver a certificate of limited partnership to the secretary of state for filing.

A certificate of limited partnership must state:

The name of the limited partnership, that complies with § 61-3-112;

The street and mailing addresses of the partnership's principal office; the address of its principal office, and a mailing address such as a post office box if the United States postal service does not deliver to the principal office;

If the partnership's principal office is not located in this state, the address of a registered office and the name and address of a registered agent for service of process in this state, which the partnership is required to maintain; the name of the limited partnership's initial registered agent and street and addresses in this state of the partnership's registered office and the county in which the registered office is located;

The name and street and mailing addresses of each general partner, and a mailing address such as a post office box if the United States postal service does not deliver to the general partner's address; and

Whether the limited partnership is a limited liability limited partnership.

A certificate of limited partnership may contain statements as to matters other than those required by subsection (b), but must not vary or otherwise affect § 61-3-104(c) and (d) in a manner inconsistent with that section.

The partnership agreement must not be filed.

A limited partnership is formed when:

The initial certificate of limited partnership is filed with the secretary of state or at any later date or time specified in the certificate of limited partnership in accordance with and subject to § 61-3-207;

At least two (2) persons have become partners;

At least one (1) person has become a general partner; and

At least one (1) person has become a limited partner.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-202. Amendment or restatement of certificate of limited partnership.

A certificate of limited partnership may be amended or restated at any time.

To amend its certificate of limited partnership, a limited partnership must deliver to the secretary of state for filing an amendment stating:

The name of the partnership; and

The text of the amendment.

To restate its certificate of limited partnership, a limited partnership must deliver to the secretary of state for filing a restatement, designated as such in its heading.

A limited partnership shall, not later than sixty (60) days after the happening of any of the following events, deliver to the secretary of state for filing an amendment to a certificate of limited partnership to reflect:

The admission of a new general partner;

The dissociation of a person as a general partner; or

The appointment of a person to wind up the limited partnership's activities and affairs under § 61-3-802(c) or (d).

If a general partner knows that any information in a filed certificate of limited partnership was inaccurate when the certificate was filed or has become inaccurate due to changed circumstances, the general partner must, not later than sixty (60) days after the general partner obtains such knowledge:

Cause the certificate to be amended; or

If appropriate, deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change under § 61-3-116 or a statement of correction under § 61-3-208.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-203. Signing of records to be delivered for filing to secretary of state.

The following records delivered to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to this chapter must be signed as follows:

An initial certificate of limited partnership must be signed by all general partners listed in the certificate;

An amendment to the certificate of limited partnership adding or deleting a statement that the limited partnership is a limited liability limited partnership must be signed by all general partners listed in the certificate;

An amendment to the certificate of limited partnership designating as general partner a person admitted under § 61-3-801(a)(3)(B) following the dissociation of a limited partnership's last general partner must be signed by that person;

An amendment to the certificate of limited partnership required by § 61-3-802(c) following the appointment of a person to wind up the dissolved limited partnership's activities and affairs must be signed by that person;

Any other amendment to the certificate of limited partnership must be signed by:

At least one (1) general partner listed in the certificate;

Each person designated in the amendment as a new general partner; and

Each person that the amendment indicates has dissociated as a general partner, unless:

The person is deceased or a guardian or general conservator has been appointed for the person and the amendment so states; or

The person has previously delivered to the secretary of state for filing a statement of dissociation;

A restated certificate of limited partnership must be signed by at least one (1) general partner listed in the certificate, and, to the extent the restated certificate effects a change to any other record under this subsection (a), the certificate must be signed in a manner that satisfies the applicable subdivision;

A statement of termination must be signed by all general partners listed in the certificate of limited partnership or, if the certificate of a dissolved limited partnership lists no general partners, by the person appointed pursuant to § 61-3-802(c) or (d) to wind up the dissolved limited partnership's activities and affairs;

Any other record delivered by a limited partnership to the secretary of state for filing must be signed by at least one (1) general partner listed in the certificate of limited partnership;

A statement by a person pursuant to § 61-3-605(a)(3) stating that the person has dissociated as a general partner must be signed by that person;

A statement of negation by a person pursuant to § 61-3-306 must be signed by that person; and

Any other record delivered on behalf of a person to the secretary of state for filing must be signed by that person.

Any record delivered for filing under this chapter may be signed by an agent, including an attorney in fact. An authorization, including a power of attorney, to sign any record or to enter into a partnership agreement or amendment of the partnership agreement must be in writing, but need not be sworn to, verified, or acknowledged, and need not be filed in the office of the secretary of state, but if in writing, must be retained by a general partner. Whenever this chapter requires a particular individual to sign a record and the individual is deceased or incompetent, the record may be signed by a legal representative of the individual.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-204. Signing and filing pursuant to judicial order.

If a person required by this chapter to sign a record or deliver a record to the secretary of state for filing under this chapter does not do so, any other person that is aggrieved may petition the appropriate court to order:

The person to sign the record;

The person to deliver the record to the secretary of state for filing; or

The secretary of state to file the record unsigned.

For purposes of subsection (a), the appropriate court is:

For actions brought under subdivisions (a)(1) and (a)(2), either:

The chancery court for the county in which the partnership maintains its principal office; or

The chancery court of Davidson County; and

For actions brought under subdivision (a)(3), the chancery court of Davidson County.

If a petitioner under subsection (a) is not the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership to which the record pertains, the petitioner must make the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership a party to the action.

A record filed under subdivision (a)(3) is effective without being signed.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-205. Liability for materially false information in filed record.

If a record delivered to the secretary of state for filing under this chapter and filed by the secretary of state contains materially false information, a person that suffers loss by reliance on the information may recover damages for the loss from a general partner if:

The record was delivered for filing on behalf of the partnership; and

The general partner knew or had notice of the materially false statement for a reasonably sufficient time before the information was relied upon so that, before the reliance, the general partner reasonably could have:

Effected an amendment under § 61-3-202;

Filed a petition under § 61-3-204; or

Delivered to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change under § 61-3-116 or a statement of correction under § 61-3-208; or

After filing, that general partner knew that any arrangement or other fact described in the certificate is materially false in any respect or has changed making the statement materially false, if that general partner had reasonably sufficient time before the information was relied upon to have:

Effected an amendment under § 61-3-202;

Filed a petition under § 61-3-204; or

Delivered to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change under § 61-3-116 or a statement of correction under § 61-3-208.

No general partner has any liability for failing to cause the amendment, correction, or cancellation of a certificate to be filed or failing to file a petition for its amendment, correction, or cancellation pursuant to subsection (a) if the certificate of amendment, certificate of cancellation, or petition is filed within ninety (90) days of when the general partner knew or should have known that the statement in the certificate was false in any material respect.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-206. Filing requirements.

To be filed by the secretary of state pursuant to this chapter, a record must be received by the secretary of state, comply with this chapter, and satisfy the following:

The filing of the record must be required or permitted by this chapter;

The record must be physically delivered in written form unless and to the extent the secretary of state permits or requires electronic delivery of the record;

The words in the record must be in English, and numbers must be in Arabic or Roman numerals, but the name of an entity need not be in English if written in English letters, or Arabic or Roman numerals;

The record must be signed by a person authorized or required under this chapter to sign the record; and

The record must state the name and capacity, if any, of each individual who signed it, either on behalf of the individual or the person authorized or required to sign the record, but need not contain a seal, attestation, acknowledgment, or verification.

If law other than this chapter prohibits the disclosure by the secretary of state of information contained in a record delivered to the secretary of state for filing, then the secretary of state must file the record if the record otherwise complies with this chapter but may redact the information.

When a record is delivered to the secretary of state for filing, any fee required under this chapter and any fee, tax, interest, or penalty required to be paid under this chapter or law other than this chapter must be paid in a manner permitted by the secretary of state or by that law.

The secretary of state may require that a record delivered in written form be accompanied by an exact or conformed copy.

The secretary of state may provide forms for filings required or permitted to be made by this chapter and may, by rule, require their use.

The secretary of state may require that a cover sheet for a filing be on a form prescribed by the secretary of state.

The secretary of state may promulgate appropriate rules establishing acceptable methods for execution of any document to be filed with the secretary of state.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1; 2020, ch. 719, § 31.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “must” following “secretary of state,” in the introductory paragraph of (a); inserted “or requires” in (a)(2); inserted a comma following “letters” in (a)(3); inserted “then” in (b); substituted “accompanied by an exact” for “accompanied by an identical” in (d); substituted “and may, by rule, require their use” for “, but, except as otherwise provided in subsection (f), their use is not required” in (e); and substituted “may” for “has the power to” in (g).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 719, § 35, June 22, 2020.

61-3-207. Effective date and time.

Subject to § 61-3-209(d), a record filed under this chapter is effective:

On the date and at the time of its filing by the secretary of state, as provided in § 61-3-209(b);

On the date of filing and at the time specified in the record as its effective time, if later than the time described in subdivision (a)(1);

At a specified delayed effective date and time, which may not be more than ninety (90) days after the date of filing; or

If a delayed effective date is specified, but no time is specified, at 4:30 p.m. on the date specified, which may not be more than ninety (90) days after the date of filing.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1; 2018, ch. 575, § 7.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “4:30 p.m.” for “12:01 a.m.” in (4).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 42. March 16, 2018.

61-3-208. Correcting filed record.

A person on whose behalf a filed record was delivered to the secretary of state for filing may correct the record if:

The record at the time of filing was inaccurate;

The record was defectively signed; or

The electronic transmission of the record to the secretary of state was defective.

A record is corrected by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of correction that:

Does not state a delayed effective date;

Is signed by the person correcting the filed record;

Identifies the filed record to be corrected, including its filing date, or has attached to the statement of correction a copy of the filed record;

Specifies the inaccuracy or defect to be corrected and the reason it is incorrect; and

Corrects the inaccuracy or defect in the filed record.

A statement of correction is effective as of the effective date of the filed record that it corrects except for purposes of § 61-3-102(d) and as to persons relying on the uncorrected filed record and adversely affected by the correction. For those purposes and as to those persons, the statement of correction is effective when filed.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-209. Duty of secretary of state to file — Review of refusal to file — Delivery of record by secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall file a record delivered to the secretary of state for filing that satisfies this chapter. The duty of the secretary of state under this section is ministerial.

When the secretary of state files a record, the secretary of state must record it as filed on the date and at the time of its delivery. After filing a record, the secretary of state shall deliver to the person that submitted the record a copy of the record with an acknowledgment of the date and time of filing.

If the secretary of state refuses to file a record, the secretary of state must, not later than fifteen (15) business days after the record is delivered:

Return the record or notify the person that submitted the record of the refusal; and

Provide a brief explanation in a record of the reason for the refusal.

If the secretary of state refuses to file a record, the person that submitted the record may petition the chancery court of Davidson County to compel filing of the record. The record and the explanation of the secretary of state of the refusal to file must be attached to the petition. The court may decide the matter in a summary proceeding.

Any judicial review of the secretary of state's refusal to file a record must be conducted in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

The filing of or refusal to file a record does not:

Affect the validity or invalidity of the record in whole or in part; or

Create a presumption that the information contained in the record is correct or incorrect.

Except as otherwise provided in § 61-3-119 or by law other than this chapter, the secretary of state may deliver any record to a person by delivering it:

In person to the person that submitted it;

To the address of the person's registered agent;

To the principal office of the person; or

To another address, including an electronic mail address, the person provides to the secretary of state for delivery.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-210. Certificate of existence or registration.

On request of any person, the secretary of state must issue a certificate of existence for a limited partnership or a certificate of registration for a registered foreign limited partnership.

A certificate under subsection (a) must state:

The limited partnership's name or the registered foreign limited partnership's name used in this state;

In the case of a limited partnership:

That a certificate of limited partnership has been filed and has taken effect;

The date the certificate became effective;

The period of the partnership's duration if the records of the secretary of state reflect that its period of duration is less than perpetual; and

That:

No statement of administrative dissolution, or statement of termination has been filed; and

The records of the secretary of state do not otherwise reflect that the partnership has been dissolved or terminated;

In the case of a registered foreign limited partnership, that the registered foreign limited partnership is registered to do business in this state;

That all fees, taxes, interest, and penalties owed to this state by the limited partnership or the foreign limited partnership have been paid, if:

Payment is reflected in the records of the secretary of state; and

Nonpayment affects the existence or registration of the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership; and

Other facts reflected in the records of the secretary of state pertaining to the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership that the person requesting the certificate reasonably requests.

Subject to any qualification stated in the certificate, a certificate issued by the secretary of state under subsection (a) may be relied on as conclusive evidence of the facts stated in the certificate.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-211. Annual report for secretary of state.

A limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing an annual report that states:

The name of the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership;

The name of its registered agent in this state;

The street address and zip code of its registered office and the name of its registered agent at that office in this state;

The name of at least one (1) general partner; and

In the case of a foreign limited partnership, its jurisdiction of formation and any alternate name adopted under § 61-3-1006(a).

Information in the annual report must be current as of the date the report is signed by the limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership.

Every limited partnership and registered foreign limited partnership shall file the annual report with the secretary of state on or before the first day of the fourth month following the close of the limited partnership's or registered foreign limited partnership's fiscal year or upon a date set by rule by the secretary of state.

If an annual report does not contain the information required by this section, the secretary of state must promptly notify the reporting limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership in a record and return the report for correction.

If an annual report contains the name or address of a registered agent that differs from the information shown in the records of the secretary of state immediately before the report becomes effective, the differing information is considered a statement of change under § 61-3-116.

If an annual report contains a street or mailing address for the principal office that differs from the information shown in the records of the secretary of state immediately before the report becomes effective, the differing information is considered a statement of change under § 61-3-116.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1; 2018, ch. 575, § 8; 2020, ch. 719, § 32.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote (a)(3) which read: “The street address, including the zip code, of its principal office and a mailing address, such as a post office box if the United States postal service does not deliver mail to the principal office.”

The 2020 amendment, in (c), substituted “of the limited partnership’s” for “of the limited partnership” and inserted “or upon a date set by rule by the secretary of state”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 42. March 16, 2018.

Acts 2020, ch. 719, § 35, June 22, 2020.